Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.080

Denial, suspension, revocation of license—Reasons—Hearing.

(1) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a license when the director finds that a licensee (a) has misrepresented titles, charges, numbers, brands, weights, proceeds of sale, or ownership of livestock; (b) has attempted payment to a consignor or the department by a check the licensee knows not to be backed by sufficient funds to cover such check; (c) has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter; (d) has violated any laws of the state that require inspection of livestock for health or identification purposes; (e) has violated any condition of the bond, as provided in this chapter.

(2) Upon notice by the director to deny, revoke, or suspend a license, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses, or the production of books or documents anywhere in the state. The applicant or licensee shall have opportunity to be heard, and may have such subpoenas issued as he or she desires. Subpoenas shall be served in the same manner as in civil cases in the superior court. Witnesses shall testify under oath which may be administered by the director. Testimony shall be recorded, and may be taken by deposition under such rules as the director may prescribe.

[ 2019 c 92 s 9; 2003 c 326 s 70; 1985 c 415 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 192 s 2; 1961 c 182 s 3; 1959 c 107 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Orders—Appeal: RCW 16.65.450.